Tennessee statutes. Title 70 Wildlife Resources
Part 5

Computer-Assisted Hunting from Remote Locations

70-4-501. Part definition.

“Computer-assisted remote hunting” means the use of a computer or any other device, equipment or software, to control remotely the aiming and discharge of a rifle, shotgun, handgun, bow and arrow, cross-bow or any other implement to hunt wildlife.

Acts 2005, ch. 96, § 1.

70-4-502. Prohibition.

A person may not engage in computer-assisted remote hunting or provide or operate facilities for computer-assisted remote hunting if the wildlife being hunted is located in this state.

Acts 2005, ch. 96, § 1.

70-4-503. Exceptions.

It is an exception to the application of this part that a person provides only:

General purpose equipment, including a computer, camera, and building materials;

General purpose computer software, including an operating system and communication programs; or

General telecommunications hardware or networking services for computers, including adapters, modems, servers, routers, and other facilities associated with internet access.

Acts 2005, ch. 96, § 1.

70-4-504. Violations.

Any person violating this part commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 2005, ch. 96, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.